Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4850.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4i. (1) At the time of the initial construction of a building or structure, including a multiple-family dwelling, but excluding a single-family dwelling or 1- or 2-family detached dwelling, the owner, operator, or builder of the building or structure shall install an automatic fire sprinkler system in a parking lot or space, as applicable, of the building or structure that is designated for electric vehicle parking. (2) Not more than 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the owner or operator of an existing building or structure, including a multiple-family dwelling, but excluding a single family dwelling or 1- or 2-family detached dwelling, that was constructed before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section shall install an automatic fire sprinkler system in a parking lot or space, as applicable, of the existing building or structure that is designated for electric vehicle parking. (3) The joint committee on administrative rules shall promulgate rules that establish standards and requirements for the installation of an automatic fire sprinkler system described in this section. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Automatic fire sprinkler system" means an integrated system of underground and overhead piping designed in accordance with fire protection engineering standards that activates by heat from a fire and discharges water over the fire area and is capable of extinguishing a fire. (b) "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is propelled solely by electrical energy and that is not capable of using gasoline, diesel fuel, or alternative fuel to propel the vehicle. (c) "Joint committee on administrative rules" means the joint committee on administrative rules created under section 35 of the administrative procedures act, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.235.